Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4117
Commission; restriction on authority; cooperate with agencies and organizations.

The commission shall not be authorized to set up research or development units or agencies of its own, but shall limit its activity to cooperation and contracts with the Department of Agriculture, University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, or other proper local, state, or national organizations, public or private, in carrying out the Dry Pea and Lentil Resources Act.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 17.